Hawaii statutes.
§29-16 Treasury as depository; duties of
comptroller. All federal-aid moneys received by the State, except as
otherwise provided for by the federal government, shall be deposited with the
director of finance and, subject to appropriation by the legislature or other
law authorizing expenditure, shall be disbursed upon warrants drawn by the
comptroller of the State supported by vouchers approved by the board,
commission, department, or officer having charge of the expenditure of the
moneys by virtue of the plan, agreement, or arrangement entered into or made
with the proper federal agency.

The comptroller may prescribe and maintain a
system of accounts and accounting as may be required by the federal government,
or any agency thereof, in carrying out the objects and purposes of the plan,
agreement, or arrangement. [L 1939, c 196, §3; RL 1945, §404; RL 1955, §12-6;
am L 1957, c 152, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS
§29-16; am L 2015, c 148, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next